Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.421] BRIBERY OF A JUROR. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Offering bribery. new text end new text begin Whoever offers, gives, or promises to give, directly or indirectly, to a juror in any court in the state, whether impaneled or not, any benefit, reward, or consideration, with intent to influence the juror's vote or position on a matter before the juror, is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Receiving bribery. new text end new text begin Whoever, being a juror summoned to any court in the state, whether impaneled or not, requests, receives, or agrees to receive, directly or indirectly, any benefit, reward, or consideration, with the understanding that in exchange this will influence the juror's vote or position on a matter before the juror, is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Sentence. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.425, is amended to read: 609.425 CORRUPTLY INFLUENCING LEGISLATORnew text begin OR JURORnew text end . Whoever by menace, deception, concealment of facts, or other corrupt means, attempts to influence the vote or other performance of duty of any member of the legislature or person elected deleted text begin theretodeleted text end new text begin to the legislature or a juror summoned to any court in the state, whether impaneled or not,new text end may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end